Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 6 Soil and Water Conservation

Cross references.

Applicability of “Ground Water Use Act of 1972” (§

12-5-90

et seq.) to water used for agricultural or poultry-processing purposes, §

12-5-105

.

Construction of dams, §

12-5-370

et seq.

Regulation of clearing, dredging, excavating, and other activities of land by Department of Natural Resources and local governing authorities, T. 12, C. 7.

Tax credit for donation of real property to be used for conservation purposes, §

48-7-29.12

.